Utah statutes.
52-4-201.   Meetings open to the public -- Exceptions.

(1)  A meeting is open to the public unless closed under Sections 52-4-204, 52-4-205, and 52-4-206.

(2) (a)  A meeting that is open to the public includes a workshop or an executive session of a public body in which a quorum is present, unless closed in accordance with this chapter.

(b)  A workshop or an executive session of a public body in which a quorum is present that is held on the same day as a regularly scheduled public meeting of the public body may only be held at the location where the public body is holding the regularly scheduled public meeting unless:

(i)  the workshop or executive session is held at the location where the public body holds its regularly scheduled public meetings but, for that day, the regularly scheduled public meeting is being held at different location;

(ii)  any of the meetings held on the same day is a site visit or a traveling tour and, in accordance with this chapter, public notice is given;

(iii)  the workshop or executive session is an electronic meeting conducted according to the requirements of Section 52-4-207; or

(iv)  it is not practicable to conduct the workshop or executive session at the regular location of the public body's open meetings due to an emergency or extraordinary circumstances.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 14, 2006 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 263, 2006 General Session

